New York, session 2025-2026, A3887.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1703 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 8-a to read as follows: 3 8-a. "Transit desert" means an area located in a city with a popu- 4 lation of a million or more that lacks a subway system and is heavily 5 car dependent. Such area shall include, but not be limited to the 6 following zip codes, some or part of, 10301, 10304, 10306, 10307, 10308, 7 10309, 10310, 10312, 11234, 11229, 11236, 11357, 11358, 11360, 11361, 8 11379, 11411, 11412, 11413, 11422, 11423, 11427, 11428, 11432, 11433, 9 11434, 11581, 11691, 11692, 11693, 11694, 11695 and 11697. 10 § 2. Section 1704-a of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 11 adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 12 5. The Triborough bridge and tunnel authority shall implement a fifty 13 percent discount for all central business district tolls, fees and other 14 charges assessed for all cars entering such district from a transit 15 desert, as defined in subdivision eight-a of section seventeen hundred 16 three of this article. Such discount shall not apply to commercial vehi- 17 cles or for-hire vehicles. To qualify for such discount, individuals 18 shall be required to provide proof of residency to ensure such individ- 19 ual resides in a transit desert. Such discount shall be periodically 20 reviewed no less than annually by the Triborough bridge and tunnel 21 authority and adjusted as necessary. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 24 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 25 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 26 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06721-01-5